Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Chapter 70. Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children.
Sec. 47.70.020.
Financial responsibility.

Financial responsibility for a child placed in accordance with the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children shall be determined in accordance with art. V of the compact. However, in the event of partial or complete default of performance under the compact, the provisions of AS

47.14.100(b)

apply.

History.

(§ 1 ch 216 SLA 1976; am § 53 ch 59 SLA 1996)

Delayed amendment of section. —

Under § 3,
ch. 93, SLA 2008, this section will read as follows: “Financial responsibility for a child placed in accordance with the Interstate Compact for the Placement of Children shall be determined in accordance with art. VII of the compact. However, in the event of partial or complete default of performance under the compact, the provisions of
AS

47.14.100(b)

apply.”
Section 11(a),
ch. 93, SLA 2008, makes this amendment conditional upon ratification of the Interstate Compact for the Placement of Children by at least 34 other states. As of May 2022, the required notice had not been received. If the condition occurs, the amendment takes effect “on the day after the date on which the commissioner of health and social services or the commissioner’s designee notifies the revisor of statutes that the contingency has occurred.”

Sec. 47.70.030.
Designation of authority.

The “appropriate public authorities” as used in art. III of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children shall, with reference to this state, mean the Department of Health and Social Services. The department shall receive and act with reference to notices required by art. III of the compact.

As used in Art. V of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, the phrase “appropriate authority in the receiving state” with reference to this state means the Department of Health and Social Services.

History.

(§ 1 ch 216 SLA 1976)

Conditional repeal of section. —

Under § 8,
ch. 93, SLA 2008, this section is repealed. Section 11(a),
ch. 93, SLA 2008, makes the repeal conditional upon ratification of the Interstate Compact for the Placement of Children by at least 34 other states. As of May 2022, the required notice had not been received. If the condition occurs, the repeal takes effect “on the day after the date on which the commissioner of health and social services or the commissioner’s designee notifies the revisor of statutes that the contingency has occurred.”

Sec. 47.70.040.
Agreements.

The officers and agencies of this state and its subdivisions having authority to place children are empowered to enter into agreements with appropriate officers or agencies of or in other party states under art. V(b) of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children.

History.

(§ 1 ch 216 SLA 1976)

Delayed amendment of section. —

Under § 4,
ch. 93, SLA 2008, this section will read as follows:
“The officers and agencies of this state and its subdivisions having authority to place children are empowered to enter into agreements with appropriate officers or agencies of or in other party states under art. V(B) and art. VII(J) of the Interstate Compact for the Placement of Children.” Section 11(a),
ch. 93, SLA 2008, makes this amendment conditional upon ratification of the Interstate Compact for the Placement of Children by at least 34 other states. As of May 2022, the required notice had not been received. If the condition occurs, the amendment takes effect “on the day after the date on which the commissioner of health and social services or the commissioner’s designee notifies the revisor of statutes that the contingency has occurred.”

Sec. 47.70.050.
Delegation by agreement.

Requirements for visitation, inspection, or supervision of children, homes, institutions, or other agencies in another party state which may apply under AS

47.14.110

shall be considered to be met if performed under an agreement entered into by appropriate officers or agencies of this state or a subdivision of this state as contemplated by art. V(b) of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children.

History.

(§ 1 ch 216 SLA 1976; am § 54 ch 59 SLA 1996)

Delayed amendment of section. —

Under § 5,
ch. 93, SLA 2008, this section will read as follows:
“Requirements for visitation, inspection, or supervision of children, homes, institutions, or other agencies in another party state that may apply under
AS

47.14.110

shall be considered to be met if performed under an agreement entered into by appropriate officers or agencies of this state or a subdivision of this state as contemplated by art. V(B) and art. VII(J) of the Interstate Compact for the Placement of Children.”
Section 11(a),
ch. 93, SLA 2008, makes this amendment conditional upon ratification of the Interstate Compact for the Placement of Children by at least 34 other states. As of May 2022, the required notice had not been received. If the condition occurs, the amendment takes effect “on the day after the date on which the commissioner of health and social services or the commissioner’s designee notifies the revisor of statutes that the contingency has occurred.”

Sec. 47.70.060.
Executive head.

As used in Art. VII of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, the term “executive head” means the governor. The governor is authorized to appoint a compact administrator in accordance with the terms of art. VII.

History.

(§ 1 ch 216 SLA 1976)

Delayed amendment of section. —

Under § 6,
ch. 93, SLA 2008, this section will read as follows:
“As used in art. VIII(B) and XIV(B) of the Interstate Compact for the Placement of Children, the term “executive head” means the commissioner of health and social services. The commissioner is authorized to establish a central compact office in accordance with the terms of art. VII(H).”
Section 11(a),
ch. 93, SLA 2008, makes this amendment conditional upon ratification of the Interstate Compact for the Placement of Children by at least 34 other states. As of May 2022, the required notice had not been received. If the condition occurs, the amendment takes effect “on the day after the date on which the commissioner of health and social services or the commissioner’s designee notifies the revisor of statutes that the contingency has occurred.”

Sec. 47.70.070.
Violations of compact.

A person who sends, brings, or causes to be sent or brought into this state from any party state, or from this state into any party state, a person under the age of 19, in violation of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $200.

History.

(§ 1 ch 216 SLA 1976)

Conditional repeal of section. —

Under § 8,
ch. 93, SLA 2008, this section is repealed. Section 11(a),
ch. 93, SLA 2008, makes the repeal conditional upon ratification of the Interstate Compact for the Placement of Children by at least 34 other states. As of May 2022, the required notice had not been received. If the condition occurs, the repeal takes effect “on the day after the date on which the commissioner of health and social services or the commissioner’s designee notifies the revisor of statutes that the contingency has occurred.”

Sec. 47.70.080.
Short title.

AS

47.70.010

may be cited as the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children.

History.

(§ 1 ch 216 SLA 1976)

Delayed amendment of section. —

Under § 1,
ch. 93, SLA 2008, this section will read as follows: “Short title.
AS

47.70.010

may be cited as the Interstate Compact for the Placement of Children.” Section 11(a),
ch. 93, SLA 2008, makes this amendment conditional upon ratification of the Interstate Compact for the Placement of Children by at least 34 other states. As of May 2022, the required notice had not been received. If the condition occurs, the amendment takes effect “on the day after the date on which the commissioner of health and social services or the commissioner's designee notifies the revisor of statutes that the contingency has occurred.”